Texas, session 892, HB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Title 10, Subtitle Z, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter 3001 to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER 3001. PROHIBITION ON DIVERSITY, EQUITY, AND INCLUSION or LGBTQ INDOCTRINATION Section 3001.001.  PROHIBITION ON DIVERSITY, EQUITY, AND INCLUSION OR LGBTQ INDOCTRINATION BY STATE AGENCIES. (a) In this section, "state agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2062.001. (b)  Notwithstanding any law, all state agency rules, policies, employment practices, communications, awards of government benefits or contracts, curricula, and all other actions must: (1)  treat people and entities equally regardless of race, color, or national origin and may not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national origin; and (2)  comply with the biological reality that there are only two sexes - male and female - and they are not changeable (c)  Any agency action promoting, in whole or part, the doctrine of "diversity, equity, and inclusion" or otherwise in violation of this section is null and void ab initio. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.